apertium-haa.haa.lexd
# Morphological Transducer for Han

# Tags below
#
# not exhaustive list - please add if anything is missing
# see also https://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Tagset
#
# Part of speech categories
# <n>      # Noun
# <v>      # Verb
# <adj>    # Adjective
# <num>    # Numeral
# <cnjcoo> # coordinating conjunction
# <cnjsub> # subordinating conjunction
# <det>    # determiner
# <np>     # proper noun
# <mod>    # "modal word"
# <pr>     # preposition
# <prn>    # pronoun
# <adv>    # adverb

# verb subcategories
# <tv>     # transitive
# <iv>     # intransitive

# determiner subcategories
# <dem>    # demonstrative
# <ind>    # indefinite
# <qnt>    # quantifying

# proper noun subcategories
# <ant>    # anthroponym (personal name)
# <cog>    # cogonem (family name)
# <top>    # toponym (place name)

# pronoun subcategories
# <pers>   # personal
# <itg>    # interrogative

# Verb grammatical tags
# - subject person
# <s_1sg>
# <s_2sg>
# <s_3sg>
# <s_1pl>
# <s_2pl>
# <s_3pl>
# - object person
# <o_1sg>
# <o_2sg>
# <o_3sg>
# <o_1pl>
# <o_2pl>
# <o_3pl>
# <refl>   # reflexive
# - aspect
# <impf>   # imperfect
# <perf>   # perfect
# <incp>   # inceptive
# <fut>    # future (optative?)

# <sent>   # Sentence-ending punctuation
# <guio>   # Hyphen
# <cm>     # Comma
# <apos>   # Apostrophe
# <quot>   # Quotation mark
# <lquot>  # Left quotation mark
# <rquot>  # Right quotation mark
# <lpar>   # Left parenthesis
# <rpar>   # Right parenthesis

# Noun grammatical tags
## possession
# <px1sg>	
# <px1pl> 
# <px2sg>
# <px2pl>
# <px3sg>
# <px3pl>
# <pxrefl>

# Preposition tags
# FIXME

# Number morphology
# <pl>     # Plural
# <sg>     # Singular


#Filter documentation 

#[3Ssub,non3Ssub] - The 3rd person object marker changes
# if the subject of the verb is 3rd person singular or not.

# 3Ssub - This denotes a 3rd person singular subject, 
# so the different 3rd person object marker is used
# non3Ssub - This denotes a non 3rd person singular subject, 
# so the more common 3rd person object marker is used.

# [impf,perf,incp,fut,opt] - These filters are used to match the
# correct aspect to the correct verb stem and subject
# Impf - imperfective
# perf - perfective
# incp - inceptive
# fut - future
# opt - optative

# [sg,pl] - some stems change based on whether the subject is singular
# or plural, these filters select the correct stem and subject marker accordingly
# sg - singular subject
# pl - plural subject

# [l,d,0cl,ł] - verbs in Han are sorted into different classifications that have different 
# subject marker morphology. The classifications are largely arbitrary
# l - contrasts with barred l 
# d 
# 0cl - the 0 classifier filter is marked 0cl to distinguish from 0cm, the 0 conjugation marker
# ł - barred l

# [0cm,dh,gh,n] - Verbs in Han are sorted into different event classes that take different 
# morphology (specifically, forms of the person markers). 
# WDR calls these classes conjugation markers. Usually, perfective and imperfective
# stems are each assigned a conjugation marker. More information on Han event classes
# can be found in the guide to WDR paradigms
# 0cm - default conjugation marker for imperfectives , "cm" added to contrast with 0cl
# dh - accomplishments, semelfactives (with perfectives and imperfectives)
# gh - achievements (with perfectives)
# n - states, activities (with perfectives)



# Other symbols
# >        # Morpheme boundary

###############################################################################
###                       M O R P H O T A C T I C S                         ###
###############################################################################

PATTERNS
## Example inflection pattern:
# NounRoot RegNounInfl
Verbs-Tv
Verbs-Iv
Number
Nouns
ProperNouns(1) [<np>:] ProperNouns(2)
PrepositionPrefixes?(1) Prepositions [<pr>:] PrepositionPrefixes?(2)
Determiners(1) [<det>:] Determiners(2)
Adjectives [<adj>:]
Conjunctions(1) Conjunctions(2) 
Punctuation
ModalWord [<mod>:]
Adverbs [<adv>:]
Pronoun(1) [<prn>:] Pronoun(2)
Numeral [<num>:]

PATTERN Nouns
NounPrefixes(1) NounRoot[possessed] [<n>:] NounPrefixes(2)  #for possessed tag prefixes
NounRoot[bare] [<n>:] #for bare nouns standing alone

#NounPrefixes?(1) NounRoot [<n>:] NounPrefixes?(2)


PATTERN Verbs-Tv
#disjunctPref    plSubj      object   deicticSubj   refl       directive    aspect    gender/qualifier     theme           conjMarker,subj,cl      stem
# VerbStem-Tv(1) subject(1) object(1)  subject(2) object(2)  VerbStem-Tv(2) aspect(1)    VerbStem-Tv(3)     VerbStem-Tv(4)       subject(3)      VerbStem-Tv(5)
(VerbStem-Tv(1) subject(1) object?(1) subject(2) object?(2) :VerbStem-Tv(2) aspect(1)   VerbStem-Tv(3)       VerbStem-Tv(4) subject(3) [ :{NOV} ] VerbStem-Tv(5) [ <v><tv>: ] VerbStem-Tv(2): aspect(2) subject(4) object?(3))[^[3Ssub,non3Ssub],^[impf,perf,incp,fut,opt],^[sg,pl],^[l,d,0cl,ł],^[0cm,dh,gh,n]]

PATTERN Verbs-Iv
#disjunctPref       plSubj  object  deicticSubj  refl   directive   aspect  gender/qualifier     theme       conjMarker,subj,cl      stem
# VerbStem-IV(1) subject(1) --     subject(2) object(2)  VerbStem-Iv(2)   aspect(1)     VerbStem-Iv(3)    VerbStem-Iv(4)   subject(3)     VerbStem-Iv(5)
(VerbStem-Iv(1)  subject(1) subject(2) object-refl-only?(1)  :VerbStem-Iv(2) aspect(1)     VerbStem-Iv(3)  VerbStem-Iv(4)       subject(3)     VerbStem-Iv(5) [ <v><iv>: ] VerbStem-Tv(2): :aspect(2) subject(4) object-refl-only?(2))[^[3Ssub,non3Ssub],^[impf,perf,incp,fut,opt],^[sg,pl],^[l,d,0cl,ł],^[0cm,dh,gh,n]]




###############################################################################
###                          L E X I C O N                                  ###
###############################################################################

## Example stem lexicon:
# LEXICON NounRoot
# house:house   # A noun


LEXICON VerbStem-Tv(5) 

#CURRENT ORDER OF COLUMNS
#disjunct                   directive                   gender/qualifier            theme                        stem                               gloss                       file name                   form            commands
